sl-SI: Tehnologija miške: 3D; Bluetooth; Igričarstvo; Laser; Mehansko; Optično; Pisalo; Sledilna krogla; Vertikalna; Brezžično; Drugo
sv: Musteknologi: 3D; Bluetooth; Spelande; Laser; Mekaniskt; Optisk; Stylus; Styrboll; Vertikal; Trådlös; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tehnologie mouse: 3D; Bluetooth; Jocuri; Laser; Mecanic; Optic; Stylus; Trackball; Vertical; Fără fir; Altele
ko: 마우스 기술: 3D; Bluetooth; 게이밍; 레이저; 기계식; 광학; 스타일러스; 트랙볼; 수직; 무선; 기타
it: Tecnologia del mouse: 3D; Bluetooth; Gaming; Laser; Meccanico; Ottico; Stilo; Trackball; Verticale; Senza fili; Altro
sk-SK: Technológia myši: 3D; Bluetooth; Hranie; Laserový; Mechanický; Optický; Ihla; Guličkový ovládač; Vertikálny; Bezdrôtový; Iné
nb: Musteknologi: 3D; Bluetooth; Spill; Laser; Mekanisk; Optisk; Pekepenn; Styrekule; Vertikal; Trådløs; Annet
zh-CN: 鼠标技术: 3D; 蓝牙; 游戏; 激光; 机械; 光学; 手写笔; 轨迹球; 垂直; 无线; 其他
es: Tecnología del ratón: 3D; Bluetooth; Juegos; Láser; Mecánico; Óptico; Lápiz; Bola de seguimiento; Vertical; Inalámbrico; Otros
en: Mouse technology: 3D; Bluetooth; Gaming; Laser; Mechanical; Optical; Stylus; Trackball; Vertical; Wireless; Other
fi: Hiiriteknologia: 3D; Bluetooth; Pelit; Laser; Mekaaninen; Optinen; Stylus; Ohjauspallo; Pystysuora; Langattomat; Muu
el: Τεχνολογία ποντικιού: 3D; Bluetooth; Βιντεοπαιχνίδια; Λέιζερ; Μηχανικό; Οπτικό καλώδιο; Γραφίδα; Ιχνόσφαιρα; Κάθετο; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tecnologia do mouse: 3D; Bluetooth; Jogos; Laser; Mecânica; Óptica; Stylus; Trackball; Vertical; Sem fio; Outro
bg-BG: Технология на мишката: 3D; Bluetooth; Гейминг; Лазерна; Механична; Оптична; Стилус; Тракбол; Вертикална; Безжична; Други
hu: Egértechnológia: 3D; Bluetooth; Játék; Lézer; Mechanikus; Optikai; Digitális toll; Hanyattegér; Vertikális; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
de: Maustechnologie: 3D; Bluetooth; Gaming; Laser; Mechanisch; Optisch; Stift; Trackball; Vertikal; Kabellos; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Tehnologija miša: 3D; Bluetooth; Gaming; Laserski; Mehanički; Optički; Olovka; Kuglica; Vertikalni; Bežični; Ostalo
ja: マウステクノロジー: 3D; Bluetooth; ゲーム; レーザー; メカニカル; 光学式; スタイラス; トラックボール; バーティカル; 無線; その他
pt-PT: Tecnologia do rato: 3D; Bluetooth; Jogar; Laser; Mecânico; Ótico; Stylus; Bola de comando; Vertical; Sem fios; Outro
vi: Công nghệ chuột: 3D; Bluetooth; Chơi game; Laser; Cơ; Quang học; Bút cảm ứng; Bi xoay; Dọc; Không dây; Khác
th: เทคโนโลยีเมาส์: 3D; บลูทูธ; การเล่นเกม; เลเซอร์; แบบกลไก; ออปติคัล; สไตลัส; แทร็กบอล; แนวตั้ง; แบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
da: Museteknologi: 3D; Bluetooth; Gaming; Laser; Mekanisk; Optisk; Stylus; Trackball; Lodret; Trådløs; Andet
zh-TW: 滑鼠技術: 3D; 藍牙; 遊戲; 雷射; 機械; 光學; 觸控筆; 軌跡球; 垂直; 無線; 其他
cs: Technologie myši: 3D; Bluetooth; Hry; Laser; Mechanický; Optická; Stylus; Trackball; Vertikální; Bezdrátové; Jiné
fr: Technologie de la souris: 3D; Bluetooth; Jeux; Laser; Mécanique; Optique; Stylet; Boule de commande; Vertical; Sans fil; Autre
lt-LT: Pelės technologija: 3D; „Bluetooth“; Žaidimų; Lazerinė; Mechaninė; Optinė; Šviesinis rašiklis; Rutulinis manipuliatorius; Vertikali; Belaidė; Kita
nl: Muistechnologie: 3D; Bluetooth; Gamen; Laser; Mechanisch; Optisch; Stylus; Trackball; Verticaal; Draadloos; Andere
ru: Технология мыши: 3D; Bluetooth; Игровая; Лазерная; Механическая; Оптическая; Стилус; Трекбол; Вертикальная; Беспроводная; Другая
tr: Fare Teknolojisi: 3B; Bluetooth; Oyun; Lazer; Mekanik; Optik; Kalem; İztopu; Dikey; Kablosuz; Diğer
pl: Technologia myszy: 3D; Bluetooth; Hazard; Laser; Mechaniczne; Optyczne; Rysik; Trackball; Pionowa; Bezprzewodowy; Inne